Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.620

Abandoned or derelict vessels.

A county has the authority, subject to the processes and limitation outlined in chapter 79.100 RCW, to store, strip, use, auction, sell, salvage, scrap, or dispose of an abandoned or derelict vessel found on or above publicly or privately owned aquatic lands within the jurisdiction of the county.

[ 2002 c 286 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 286: See RCW 79.100.901.